dev/apertium-kur.kur.lexc
LEXICON Accidents_PastStem_în

în%<v%>%<inf%>@D.PREF@:n@D.PREF@ # ; ! nivîsîn
în%<v%>%<inf%>%<obl%>@D.PREF@:na@D.PREF@ # ; ! nivîsîna 
în%<v%>%<pp%>@D.PREF@:%{VSUFP%}@D.PREF@ # ; ! nivîsî

în%<v%>%<perf%>%<pres%>@D.PREF@:@D.PREF@ PersonalSuffixesPerfect ; ! ez nivîsime 
în%<v%>%<neg%>%<perf%>%<pres%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixesPerfect ; ! ez nenivîsime

în%<v%>%<perf%>%<past%>@D.PREF@:i%{IEPH%}@D.PREF@ BûnPast ; ! ez nivîsibûm
în%<v%>%<neg%>%<perf%>%<past%>@R.PREF.ne@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.ne@ BûnPast ; ! ez nenivîsibûm
în%<v%>%<pis%>@R.PREF.bi@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.bi@ BûnPrs ; ! ez binivîsibim
!! the bí- subjunctive prefix may be omitted for stylisic reasons
în%<v%>%<pis%>@D.PREF@:i%{IEPH%}@D.PREF@ BûnPrs ; ! ez nivîsibim ^LR^
în%<v%>%<neg%>%<pis%>@R.PREF.ne@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.ne@ BûnPrs ; ! ez nenivîsibim

în%<v%>%<past%>%<cond%>@R.PREF.bi@:@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixesIrrealis ; ! ez binivîsama

în%<v%>%<past%>@D.PREF@:@D.PREF@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nivîsim
în%<v%>%<neg%>%<past%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nenivîsim
în%<v%>%<pii%>@R.PREF.di@:@R.PREF.di@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez dinivîsim
în%<v%>%<neg%>%<pii%>@R.PREF.nedi@:@R.PREF.nedi@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nedinivîsim

LEXICON Accidents_PresStem_an

an%<v%>%<pri%>@R.PREF.di@@D.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.di@@D.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez dimam
an%<v%>%<prs%>@R.PREF.bi@:@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez bimam
an%<v%>%<neg%>%<pri%>@R.PREF.na@:@R.PREF.na@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez namam
an%<v%>%<neg%>%<prs%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nemam
an%<v%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>@R.PREF.bi@:e@R.PREF.bi@ # ; ! bime
an%<v%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>@R.PREF.bi@:in@R.PREF.bi@ # ; ! bimin
an%<v%>%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>@R.PREF.ne@:e@R.PREF.ne@ # ; ! neme
an%<v%>%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>@R.PREF.ne@:in@R.PREF.ne@ # ; ! nemin

LEXICON Accidents_PastStem_an

an%<v%>%<inf%>@D.PREF@:n@D.PREF@ # ; ! man
an%<v%>%<inf%>%<obl%>@D.PREF@:na@D.PREF@ # ; ! mana
an%<v%>%<pp%>@D.PREF@:%{VSUFP%}î@D.PREF@ # ; ! manî

an%<v%>%<perf%>%<pres%>@D.PREF@:@D.PREF@ PersonalSuffixesPerfect ; ! ez mamime
an%<v%>%<neg%>%<perf%>%<pres%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixesPerfect ; ! ez nemamime

an%<v%>%<perf%>%<past%>@D.PREF@:i%{IEPH%}@D.PREF@ BûnPast ; ! ez mabûm
an%<v%>%<neg%>%<perf%>%<past%>@R.PREF.ne@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.ne@ BûnPast ; ! ez nemabûm
an%<v%>%<pis%>@R.PREF.bi@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.bi@ BûnPrs ; ! ez bimabim
!! the bí- subjunctive prefix may be omitted for stylisic reasons
an%<v%>%<pis%>@D.PREF@:i%{IEPH%}@D.PREF@ BûnPrs ; ! ez mabim ^LR^
an%<v%>%<neg%>%<pis%>@R.PREF.ne@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.ne@ BûnPrs ; ! ez nemabim

an%<v%>%<past%>%<cond%>@R.PREF.bi@:@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixesIrrealis ; ! ez bimama

an%<v%>%<past%>@D.PREF@:@D.PREF@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez mam 
an%<v%>%<neg%>%<past%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nemam
an%<v%>%<pii%>@R.PREF.di@:@R.PREF.di@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez dimam
an%<v%>%<neg%>%<pii%>@R.PREF.nedi@:@R.PREF.nedi@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nedimam

LEXICON PersonalSuffixes

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%{VSUF%}im # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%{VSUF%}î # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%{VSUF%}e # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%{VSUF%}in # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%{VSUF%}in # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%{VSUF%}in # ;

LEXICON PersonalSuffixesPerfect

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%{VSUF%}ime # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%{VSUF%}iye # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%{VSUF%}iye # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%{VSUF%}ine # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%{VSUF%}ine # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%{VSUF%}ine # ;

LEXICON PersonalSuffixesIrrealis

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%{VSUF%}ama # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%{VSUF%}ayî # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%{VSUF%}a # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%{VSUF%}ana # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%{VSUF%}ana # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%{VSUF%}ana # ;

LEXICON NounRoot

mirov:mirov mirov__n ; ! lm="mirov" :: "man"
xwendevan:xwendevan mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
karker:karker mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
mêr:mêr mirov__n ; ! lm="mêr" :: "man"
doktor:doktor mirov__n ; ! lm="doktor" :: "doctor"
heval:heval mirov__n ; ! lm="heval" :: "friend"
kur:kur mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
xiyar:xiyar mirov__n ; ! lm="xiyar" :: "cucumber"
ap:ap mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
bav:bav mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
çav:çav mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
bel:bel mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
kurd:kurd mirov__n ; ! lm="kurd" :: "kurd"
hogir:hogir mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
gund:gund mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
xwêndekar:xwêndekar mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
endazyar:endazyar mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
ziman:ziman mirov__n ; ! lm="ziman" :: "language"
gotar:gotar mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
şagirt:şagirt mirov__n ; ! lm="" :: ""
nivîskar:nivîskar mirov__n ; ! lm="nivîskar" :: "writer"
ba:ba ba__n; ! lm="ba" :: "wind"
roj:roj roj__n; ! lm="roj" :: "day"
jin:jin roj__n; ! lm="jin" :: "woman"
xanî:xan xan/î__n; ! lm="xanî" :: "house"

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Adjectives
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON AdjRoot

nû:nû nû__adj ; ! lm="nû" :: "new"
xur:xur nû__adj ; ! lm="xur" :: "strong"
pêwist:pêwis pêwis/t__adj; ! lm="pêwist" :: "important"

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Pronouns 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Numerals
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Numerals

yek:yek yek__num ;  ! lm="yek" :: "one"

di:du şeş__num ; !
sê:sê şeş__num ; !
çar:çar şeş__num ; !
pênc:pênc şeş__num ; !
şeş:şeş şeş__num ; !
heft:heft şeş__num ; !
heşt:heşt şeş__num ; !
neh:neh şeş__num ; !
deh:deh şeş__num ; !
yanzdeh:yanzdeh şeş__num ; !
dwanzdeh:dwanzdeh şeş__num ; !
sêzdeh:sêzdeh şeş__num ; !
çardeh:çardeh şeş__num ; !
panzdeh:panzdeh şeş__num ; !
şanzdeh:şanzdeh şeş__num ; !
hivdeh:hivdeh şeş__num ; !
hijdeh:hijdeh şeş__num ; !
nozdeh:nozdeh şeş__num ; !


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Prepositions
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Prepositions

cem:cem Prep  ; ! lm="cem" :: "near to"
ba:ba Prep  ; ! lm="ba" :: "near to"
ji:ji Prep ; ! lm="ji" :: "from"
ji% bo:ji% bo Prep ; ! lm="ji bo" :: "in order to"
ber:ber Prep  ; ! lm="ber" :: "in front of"
berî:berî Prep  ; ! lm="berî" :: "before"
derveyî:derveyî Prep ; ! lm="berî" :: "outside of"
piştî:piştî Prep ; ! lm="piştî" :: "after"
ser:ser Prep ; ! lm="ser" :: "on"
ta:ta Prep ; ! lm="ta" :: "until"
tevî:tevî Prep ; ! lm="tevî" :: "along with"

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Conjunctions
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Conjunctions

û:û CC ; ! lm="û" :: "and"
çaxê% ku:çaxê% ku CS ; ! lm="çaxê ku" :: "when"

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Punctuation
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
!%<sent%>:! # ;
?%<sent%>:? # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;

LEXICON VerbStems 
nivîs:nivîsî Accidents_PastStem_în ; !lm="nivîsîn" :: "to write"
tirs:tirsî Accidents_PastStem_în ; !lm="tirsîn" :: "to fear"
kir:kirî Accidents_PastStem_în ; !lm="kirîn" :: "to bring"
ewt:ewtî Accidents_PastStem_în ; !lm="ewtîn" :: "to bark"
m:ma Accidents_PresStem_an ; !lm="man" :: "to remain"
m:ma Accidents_PastStem_an ; !lm="man" :: "to remain"
